Washington statutes.
RCW 17.06.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, "principal board of county commissioners", "principal county treasurer", and "principal county auditor" mean respectively those in the county of that part of the proposed intercounty weed district in which the greatest amount of acreage is located.

[ 1959 c 205 s 1.]